Illinois, session 104th, SB1960.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Dual Credit Quality Act is amended by 5changing Sections 16 and 20 and by adding Sections 16.25, 619.5, 20.5, and 36 as follows: 7    (110 ILCS 27/16)8    Sec. 16. High school and community college partnership 9agreements; dual credit. A community college district shall, 10upon the request of a school district within the jurisdiction 11of the community college district, enter into a partnership 12agreement with the school district to offer dual credit 13coursework. Prior to offering dual credit coursework, a school 14district shall attempt to enter into a partnership agreement 15with the community college district in the community college 16district in which the school district is located. If pursuing 17an alternative provider other than the community college 18district, the school district shall enter into a partnership 19agreement with the alternative postsecondary institution that 20complies with the requirements of this Section. 21    A school district may offer any course identified in the 22Illinois Articulation Initiative General Education Core 23Curriculum package under the Illinois Articulation Initiative   SB1960- 2 -LRB104 12136 LNS 22235 b1Act as a dual credit course on the campus of a high school of 2the school district and may use a high school instructor who 3has met the academic credential requirements under this Act to 4teach the dual credit course.5    The partnership agreement shall include all of the 6following:7        (1) The establishment of the school district's and the 8    community college district's respective roles and 9    responsibilities in providing the program and ensuring the 10    quality and instructional rigor of the program. This must 11    include an assurance that the community college district 12    has appropriate academic control of the curriculum, 13    consistent with any State or federal law and as required 14    or negotiated with the Higher Learning Commission or other 15    applicable accrediting agency.16        (2) The dual credit courses that the school district 17    will offer its students and whether those courses will be 18    offered on the high school or community college campus or 19    through an online platform established by the Illinois 20    Community College Board.21        (3) The establishment of academic criteria for 22    granting eligibility for high school students to enroll in 23    dual credit coursework. The academic criteria shall be 24    evidence-based and shall include multiple appropriate 25    measures to determine whether a student is prepared for 26    any dual credit coursework in which the student enrolls.  SB1960- 3 -LRB104 12136 LNS 22235 b1        (4) The establishment of any limitations that the 2    school district or community college district may put on 3    course offerings due to availability of instructors, the 4    availability of students for specific course offerings, or 5    local board policy.6        (5) The requirement that the dual credit instructor 7    meet the academic credential requirements to teach a dual 8    credit course, consistent with paragraphs (1), (2), and 9    (3) of Section 20 of this Act, but shall not be required to 10    exceed those credentials.11        (6) The collaborative process and criteria by which 12    the school district shall identify and recommend and the 13    community college district shall review and approve high 14    school instructors of dual credit courses taught on the 15    campus of a high school. This provision shall require that 16    the school district be responsible for hiring and 17    compensating the instructor.18        (7) The requirement that a community college district 19    take the appropriate steps to ensure that dual credit 20    courses are equivalent to those courses offered at the 21    community college in quality and rigor to qualify for 22    college credit. The dual credit programs shall encompass 23    the following characteristics:24            (A) Student learning outcomes expected for dual 25        credit courses in General Education Core Curriculum 26        courses and the professional and career and technical   SB1960- 4 -LRB104 12136 LNS 22235 b1        disciplines shall be the same as the student learning 2        outcomes expected for the same courses taught on the 3        postsecondary campus.4            (B) Course content, course delivery, and course 5        rigor shall be evaluated by the community college 6        chief academic officer or his or her designee, in 7        consultation with the school district's superintendent 8        or his or her designee. The evaluation shall be 9        conducted in a manner that is consistent with the 10        community college district's review and evaluation 11        policy and procedures for on-campus adjunct faculty, 12        including visits to the secondary class. This 13        evaluation shall be limited to the course and the 14        ability of the instructor to deliver quality, rigorous 15        college credit coursework. This evaluation shall not 16        impact the instructor's performance evaluation under 17        Article 24A of the School Code.18            (C) The academic supports and, if applicable, 19        guidance that will be provided to students 20        participating in the program by the high school and 21        the community college district.22        (8) Identify all fees and costs to be assessed by the 23    community college district for dual credit courses. This 24    provision shall require that any fees and costs assessed 25    for dual credit courses shall be reasonable and promote 26    student access to those courses, and may take into account   SB1960- 5 -LRB104 12136 LNS 22235 b1    regional considerations and differences.2        (8.5) The collaborative process and criteria by which 3    a school district and a community college district shall 4    work to ensure that individual students with disabilities 5    have access to dual credit courses, provided that those 6    students are able to meet the criteria for entry into a 7    dual credit course. Through this process and criteria, the 8    student shall have access to the supplementary aids and 9    accommodations included in the student's individualized 10    education program under Article 14 of the School Code or 11    Section 504 plan under the federal Rehabilitation Act of 12    1973 while the student is accessing a dual credit course 13    on a high school campus, in accordance with established 14    practices at the high school for providing these services. 15    A student who accesses a dual credit course on a community 16    college campus shall have access to supplementary aids and 17    accommodations provided in the partnership agreement, 18    including access to the community college's disability 19    services. A school district and community college district 20    shall work together to provide seamless communication 21    about the student's progress. 22        (9) The community college district shall establish a 23    mechanism for evaluating and documenting on a regular 24    basis the performance of students who complete dual credit 25    courses, consistent with paragraph (9) of Section 20 and 26    Section 30 of this Act, and for sharing that data in a   SB1960- 6 -LRB104 12136 LNS 22235 b1    meaningful and timely manner with the school district. 2    This evaluation shall be limited to the course and the 3    coursework. This evaluation shall not impact the 4    instructor's performance evaluation under Article 24A of 5    the School Code.6        (10) The expectations for maintaining the rigor of 7    dual credit courses that are taught at the high school and 8    including students not deemed ready for college-level 9    coursework according to the standards of the community 10    college. 11        (11) A requirement that the school district and 12    community college annually assess disaggregated data 13    pertaining to dual credit course enrollments, completions, 14    and subsequent postsecondary enrollment and performance to 15    the extent feasible. If applicable, this assessment shall 16    include an analysis of dual credit courses with credit 17    sections for dual credit and for high school credit only 18    pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 16.5 that reviews 19    student characteristics by credit section in relation to 20    gender, race and ethnicity, and low-income status. 21        (12) For courses taught by a high school instructor at 22    the high school, the school districts' may rely policies 23    and collective bargaining agreement obligations to 24    determine maximum class size enrollment and the number of 25    sections of a course. 26    If, within 180 calendar days of the school district's   SB1960- 7 -LRB104 12136 LNS 22235 b1initial request to enter into a partnership agreement with the 2community college district, the school district and the 3community college district do not reach agreement on the 4partnership agreement, then the school district and community 5college district shall jointly implement the provisions of the 6Model Partnership Agreement established under Section 19 of 7this Act for which local agreement could not be reached. A 8community college district may combine its negotiations with 9multiple school districts to establish one multi-district 10partnership agreement or may negotiate individual partnership 11agreements at its discretion.12(Source: P.A. 102-516, eff. 8-20-21; 102-1077, eff. 1-1-23.) 13    (110 ILCS 27/16.25 new)14    Sec. 16.25. Dual Credit Qualifications Committee. A 15partnership agreement under Section 16 shall provide for a 16Dual Credit Qualifications Committee that shall develop a Dual 17Credit Instructor Qualification Framework. The Dual Credit 18Qualifications Committee shall consist of representatives from 19both the school district and the community college district. 20The Dual Credit Qualifications Committee shall meet annually.21        (1) The Dual Credit Instructor Qualification Framework 22    shall define the appropriate graduate coursework for fully 23    qualified and minimally qualified instructors and the 24    equivalent experience required to be a fully qualified 25    career and technical education instructor. The Framework   SB1960- 8 -LRB104 12136 LNS 22235 b1    shall list the appropriate coursework for each discipline 2    within the Illinois Articulation Initiative General 3    Education Core Curriculum package by the discipline to be 4    taught.5        (2) The Framework shall establish equivalent 6    experience that is commensurate with achievement of 7    academic credentials to be a fully qualified career and 8    technical education dual-credit course instructor. The 9    criteria shall determine a minimum threshold of experience 10    and appropriate combination of the following:11            (A) related work experience, which shall not 12        exceed 2,000 hours and shall include the appropriate 13        recognizable credentials;14            (B) research or scholarship;15            (C) recognized achievement;16            (D) previous years of teaching experience;17            (E) honors and awards; and18            (F) other activities and factors to demonstrate 19        teaching competencies appropriate to the field of 20        instruction.21        The Framework may differentiate between career and 22    technical courses and general education core curriculum 23    courses. The Framework shall reference the faculty 24    credential standards allowed by the Higher Learning 25    Commission to ensure uniform guidance from this State and 26    the Higher Learning Commission.  SB1960- 9 -LRB104 12136 LNS 22235 b1        If a framework is not agreed upon by the local school 2    district and local community college partner before June 3    30 for the upcoming school year, they shall jointly 4    implement the model framework set by the Illinois 5    Community College Board and the State Board of Education 6    in Section 19.5.  7    (110 ILCS 27/19.5 new)8    Sec. 19.5. Model Dual Credit Instructor Qualification 9Framework. A Model Dual Credit Instructor Qualification 10Framework shall be developed through a Dual Credit 11Qualifications Committee involving collaboration between the 12Illinois Community College Board and the State Board of 13Education by June 30, 2026. The Committee shall consist of 5 14members appointed by the State Superintendent of Education and 155 members appointed by the Executive Director of the Illinois 16Community College Board. The Model Dual Credit Instructor 17Qualification Framework shall address all of the matters set 18forth in Section 16.25. 19    (110 ILCS 27/20)20    Sec. 20. Standards. All institutions offering dual credit 21courses shall meet the following standards:22        (1) High school instructors teaching credit-bearing 23    college-level courses for dual credit must meet any of the 24    academic credential requirements set forth in this   SB1960- 10 -LRB104 12136 LNS 22235 b1    paragraph or paragraph (2) or (3) of this Section and need 2    not meet higher certification requirements or those set 3    out in Article 21B of the School Code:4            (A) Approved instructors of dual credit courses 5        shall meet any of the faculty credential standards 6        allowed by the Higher Learning Commission to determine 7        minimally qualified faculty. At the request of an 8        instructor, an instructor who meets these credential 9        standards shall be provided by the State Board of 10        Education with a Dual Credit Endorsement, to be placed 11        on the professional educator license, as established 12        by the State Board of Education and as authorized 13        under Article 21B of the School Code and promulgated 14        through administrative rule in cooperation with the 15        Illinois Community College Board and the Board of 16        Higher Education. The academic credentials required to 17        be a fully qualified instructor shall include either 18        (i) a master's degree within the discipline to be 19        taught or (ii) any master's degree and not more than 18 20        graduate hours appropriate to the academic field of 21        study or in the discipline to be taught, as defined by 22        the Dual Credit Instructor Qualification Framework. 23            (B) An instructor who does not meet the faculty 24        credential standards allowed by the Higher Learning 25        Commission to determine minimally qualified faculty 26        may teach dual credit courses if the instructor has a   SB1960- 11 -LRB104 12136 LNS 22235 b1        professional development plan, approved by the 2        institution and shared with the State Board of 3        Education no later than January 1, 2025, to raise his 4        or her credentials to be in line with the credentials 5        under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph (1). The 6        institution shall have 30 days to review the plan and 7        approve an instructor professional development plan 8        that is in line with the credentials set forth in 9        paragraph (2) of this Section. The institution shall 10        not unreasonably withhold approval of a professional 11        development plan. These approvals shall be good for as 12        long as satisfactory progress toward the completion of 13        the credential is demonstrated, but in no event shall 14        a professional development plan be in effect for more 15        than 3 years from the date of its approval or after 16        January 1, 2028, whichever is sooner. A high school 17        instructor whose professional development plan is not 18        approved by the institution may appeal to the Illinois 19        Community College Board or the Board of Higher 20        Education, as appropriate.21            (C) The Illinois Community College Board and Board 22        of Higher Education shall report yearly on their 23        Internet websites the following: 24                (i) the number of teachers presently enrolled 25            in an approved professional development plan under 26            this Section;  SB1960- 12 -LRB104 12136 LNS 22235 b1                (ii) the number of instructors who 2            successfully completed an approved professional 3            development plan;4                (iii) the number of instructors who did not 5            successfully complete an approved professional 6            development plan after 3 years;7                (iv) a breakdown of the information in 8            subdivisions (i), (ii), and (iii) of this 9            subparagraph (C) by subject area; and10                (v) a summary, by community college district, 11            of professional development plans that are in 12            progress, that were successfully completed, or 13            that have expired. 14        (2) For a high school instructor entering into a 15    professional development plan prior to January 1, 2023, 16    the high school instructor shall qualify for a 17    professional development plan if the instructor:18            (A) has a master's degree in any discipline and 19        has earned 9 graduate hours in a discipline in which he 20        or she is currently teaching or expects to teach; or21            (B) has a bachelor's degree with a minimum of 18 22        graduate hours in a discipline that he or she is 23        currently teaching or expects to teach and is enrolled 24        in a discipline-specific master's degree program; and25            (C) agrees to demonstrate his or her progress 26        toward completion to the supervising institution, as   SB1960- 13 -LRB104 12136 LNS 22235 b1        outlined in the professional development plan.2        (2.5) For a high school instructor entering into a 3    professional development plan on or after January 1, 2023, 4    the high school instructor shall qualify for a 5    professional development plan if the instructor: 6            (A) has a master's degree in any discipline, has 7        earned 9 graduate hours in a discipline in which he or 8        she currently teaches or expects to teach, and agrees 9        to demonstrate his or her progress toward completion 10        to the supervising institution, as outlined in the 11        professional development plan; or 12            (B) is a fully licensed instructor in career and 13        technical education who is halfway toward meeting the 14        institution's requirements for faculty in the 15        discipline to be taught and agrees to demonstrate his 16        or her progress toward completion to the supervising 17        institution, as outlined in the professional 18        development plan. 19        (3) An instructor in career and technical education 20    courses must possess the credentials and demonstrated 21    teaching competencies appropriate to the field of 22    instruction.23        (4) Course content must be equivalent to 24    credit-bearing college-level courses offered at the 25    community college.26        (5) Learning outcomes must be the same as   SB1960- 14 -LRB104 12136 LNS 22235 b1    credit-bearing college-level courses and be appropriately 2    measured.3        (6) A high school instructor is expected to 4    participate in any orientation developed by the 5    institution for dual credit instructors in course 6    curriculum, assessment methods, and administrative 7    requirements.8        (7) Dual credit instructors must be given the 9    opportunity to participate in all activities available to 10    other adjunct faculty, including professional development, 11    seminars, site visits, and internal communication, 12    provided that such opportunities do not interfere with an 13    instructor's regular teaching duties.14        (8) Every dual credit course must be reviewed annually 15    by faculty through the appropriate department to ensure 16    consistency with campus courses. 17        (9) Dual credit students must be assessed using 18    methods consistent with students in traditional 19    credit-bearing college courses. 20        (10) Within 15 days after entering into or renewing a 21    partnership agreement, the institution shall notify its 22    faculty of the agreement, including access to copies of 23    the agreement if requested. 24(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-1077, eff. 1-1-23; 25103-154, eff. 6-30-23.)   SB1960- 15 -LRB104 12136 LNS 22235 b1    (110 ILCS 27/20.5 new)2    Sec. 20.5. Appeal Process.3    (a) A community college district with an established 4partnership agreement with a school district has 30 calendar 5days from the initial course request to notify the school 6district of its disapproval of the course request, instructor, 7course documentation, or the community college district's 8withdrawal of course or instructor approval. Thereafter, the 9school district shall appeal the denial or withdrawal of the 10instructor approval to the Illinois Community College Board 11within 14 calendar days after the disapproval notice. The 12Illinois Community College Board shall render a decision 13within 45 calendar days after filing and provide notice of its 14decision to the community college district and school 15district. Upon determination by the Illinois Community College 16Board:17        (1) If the Illinois Community College Board finds in 18    favor of the school district's request for the course 19    request, instructor, or course documentation, the school 20    district may pursue an alternative postsecondary 21    institution to provide that course and must notify the 22    community college district within 14 calendar days after 23    the Illinois Community college Board's decision with its 24    intent to do so, along with the reason for seeking an 25    alternative provider.26        (2) If the Illinois Community College Board finds in   SB1960- 16 -LRB104 12136 LNS 22235 b1    favor of the community college district's decision, then 2    the decision of the community college district to 3    disapprove the school district's course request, 4    instructor, course documentation, or the community college 5    district's withdrawal of course or instructor approval 6    shall be upheld, and the school district shall not have 7    the opportunity to pursue an alternative postsecondary 8    institution. 9    (110 ILCS 27/36 new)10    Sec. 36. Study.11    (a) The Illinois Community College Board may conduct a 12study to examine dual credit students and their short-term and 13long-term outcomes, which may include determining how 14differing types and levels of credit-hour achievement 15influence college enrollment, persistence, advancement, and 16completion, either at a public community college or public 17university. The study shall attempt to isolate the unique 18effect of credit-hour achievement levels on college enrollment 19and college completion overall and for subpopulations by 20student subgroups, such as race and ethnicity, sex, and 21dual-credit type. The study shall further examine the 22differential impacts of enrollment in specific career pathways 23versus ad hoc, dual-credit participation on college 24enrollment, persistence, advancement, and completion at either 25a public community college or public university.  SB1960- 17 -LRB104 12136 LNS 22235 b1    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 2contrary, all public universities, all public community 3colleges, the State Board of Education, the Illinois Student 4Assistance Commission, and any other State agency that 5collects pertinent data shall furnish such data and 6information to the Illinois Community College Board as the 7Illinois Community College Board deems necessary to fulfill 8the requirements of this Section.  SB1960- 18 -LRB104 12136 LNS 22235 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    110 ILCS 27/164    110 ILCS 27/16.25 new5    110 ILCS 27/19.5 new6    110 ILCS 27/207    110 ILCS 27/20.5 new8    110 ILCS 27/36 new